Wyoming, session 2025, HB0200.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-135(a)(intro), (i), (iii), (v),
by creating new paragraphs (vi) through (viii), (b), (d) by
creating a new paragraph (ix), (f) and by creating new
subsections (g) through (k) and 21-7-110(a)(viii), by
creating a new paragraph (ix) and by renumbering (ix) as
(x) are amended to read:

21-3-135. Parental and guardian notices related to
the educational, physical, mental and emotional health of
students; student welfare; procedures; school district
prohibitions.

(a) Each school district including school district
personnel shall:

(i) Notify a student's parent or guardian as
soon as practicable if there is a change in the student's
educational, physical, mental or emotional health or
well-being during school hours or while the student is
engaged in any activity, extracurricular activity, event,
program or function where school district personnel are
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421
responsible for the student regardless of location.
Procedures adopted under this paragraph shall reinforce the
fundamental right of parents and guardians to make
decisions regarding the care and control of their children
by requiring school district personnel to encourage a
student to discuss issues relating to his well-being with
his parent or guardian or to facilitate discussion with the
parent or guardian;

(iii) Not adopt or implement any formal or
informal rules, policies, practices or procedures that
prohibit or discourage school district personnel from
notifying a student's parent or guardian about the
student's educational, physical, mental or emotional health
or well-being during school hours or while the student is
engaged in any activity, extracurricular activity, event,
program or function where school district personnel are
responsible for the student regardless of location or a
change in the student's related services as authorized
under paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section;

(v) Obtain written or electronic permission from
each student's parent or legal guardian not less than one
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421
(1) day prior to the student participating or receiving
instruction in any trainings, courses or classes that
address sexual orientation, or gender identity or
diversity, equity or inclusion;.

(vi) Notify a student's parent or guardian not
less than five (5) days prior to the student attending or
participating in an assembly, extracurricular activity or
guest speaker presentation and provide the option for the
student's parent or guardian to opt the student out of the
attendance or participation;

(vii) Adopt a policy, practice or procedure to
ensure that school district personnel and students are not
required to refer to a student using the student's
preferred pronoun if the pronoun does not align with the
student's biological sex;

(viii) Adopt a policy, practice or procedure to
allow school district personnel to withdraw or opt out of
mandatory classes, lessons, trainings, educational
activities or any program or activity involving diversity,
equity or inclusion.
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421

(b) Effective school year 2024-2025 and each school
year thereafter, at the beginning of each school year, each
school district shall make available to parents and
guardians any routine health care services offered or
provided at the student's school and provide the option for
the parent or guardian to withhold consent or decline any
routine specific health care services. Parental or guardian
consent to a routine health care service shall not waive
the parent's or guardian's right to access the student's
educational or health care records or to be notified of a
change in the student's educational, physical, mental or
emotional health or well-being during school hours or while
the student is engaged in any activity, extracurricular
activity, event, program or function where school district
personnel are responsible for the student regardless of
location. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
preventing school district personnel from rendering first
aid to a student or summoning emergency responders in case
of sudden need.

(d) Each school district shall adopt necessary rules,
policies, practices and procedures for a parent or guardian
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421
to file a complaint with the school district regarding a
school district's non-compliance with this section, in
accordance with the following:

(ix) Each school district shall annually report
to the department of education the number of complaints
filed, the number of hearings requested and held and the
number of decisions appealed for judicial review under this
subsection and the number of civil cases filed under
subsection (j) of this section. The department of education
shall publish the report required by this paragraph on the
department of education's official website.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit school
districts from complying with mandatory reporting of abuse
or neglect pursuant to W.S. 14-3-205. For purposes of this
section, "abuse" means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)
and "neglect" means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii).

(g) Effective school year 2025-2026 and each school
year thereafter, each school district shall make available
to parents and guardians and publish on the school
district's official website:
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421

(i) At the beginning of each school year, the
curriculum for each class or grade level at each public
school within the school district and any updates to the
curriculum that occur during the school year;

(ii) Any physical or electronic materials
distributed or made available to students during school
hours or while the student is engaged in any activity,
extracurricular activity, event, program or function where
school district personnel are responsible for the student
regardless of location;

(iii) At the beginning of each school year, all
written policies, practices and procedures and during the
school year any updates to any written policy, practice or
procedure. Each school district shall make available to
parents and guardians and publish on the school district's
official website any updates to any written policy,
practice or procedure within thirty (30) days after the
school district adopts such updates.

HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421
(h) A teacher or school administrator who violates
this section shall be subject to disciplinary action under
W.S. 21-7-110.

(j) A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of
this section may file a civil action against any school
district personnel or school district to recover a civil
penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) per
violation of this section, including subsequent or
continued violations. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, no school district personnel or school district
shall be immune from liability for a violation of this
section. The aggrieved person may bring an action in
district court in the county where the violation of this
section occurred.

(k) As used in this section:

(i) "Abuse" means as defined by W.S.
14-3-202(a)(ii);

(ii) "Assembly" means a gathering of students
and school district personnel to share information and
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421
announcements, celebrate or present achievements or awards,
promote school spirit or attend presentations from guest
speakers;

(iii) "Curriculum" means a course of study for
uniform student content and performance standards for the
common core of knowledge and common core of skills as
specified under W.S. 21-9-101(b) including instructional,
guidance and supplemental materials;

(iv) "Diversity, equity or inclusion" means any
program, activity or policy that promotes differential or
preferential treatment of persons or classifies persons on
the basis of race, color, sex, national origin, gender
identity or sexual orientation;

(v) "Extracurricular activities" means a
voluntary activity sponsored by the public school or school
district or an organization sanctioned by the school
district. "Extracurricular activities" shall include but
are not limited to preparation for and involvement in
public performances, contests, athletic competitions,
demonstrations, displays and club activities;
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421

(vi) "Neglect" means as defined by W.S.
14-3-202(a)(vii);

(vii) "Policies, practices or procedures"
includes any written or electronic materials issued by a
school district or school district personnel and any
unwritten customs encouraged by a school district or school
district personnel that governs conduct at a public school
within a school district;

(viii) "School administrator" includes a
superintendent of a school district, assistant
superintendent, principal or assistant principal;

(ix) "School district personnel" means persons
employed by a school district, independent contractors
retained by a school district and volunteers who may have
contact with students in the course of volunteering for a
school district;

(x) "School hours" means the period of time that
a student is required to be in a public school.
HB0200

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0421

21-7-110. Suspension or dismissal of teachers;
notice; hearing; independent hearing officer; board review
and decision; appeal.

(a) The board may suspend or dismiss any teacher, or
terminate any continuing contract teacher, for any of the
following reasons:

(viii) Conviction of a felony; and

(ix) Violation of W.S. 21-3-135; and

(ix)(x) Any other good or just cause relating to
the educational process.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0200